California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(i) In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (g) a district attorney may represent any political subdivision located within his or her county directly, in which case he or she shall notify in writing such political subdivision of his or her intention to bring any such action on its behalf, and at any time within 30 days thereafter, that political subdivision may, by formal resolution of its governing body or as otherwise specifically provided by applicable law, withdraw the authority of the district attorney to bring the intended action. In any action in which a district attorney directly represents any political subdivision located within his county, the district attorney shall retain out of the proceeds, if any, resulting from such action, an amount equal to the expense incurred by the district attorney in the investigation and prosecution of such action or an amount equal to 10 percent of the total recovery obtained by the district attorney, whichever is greater. In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (g) in which the county, through the district attorney, is the class representative of political subdivisions located within such county, the district attorney shall retain the proceeds, if any, of any attorneys’ fees awarded by the court in which such action is pending to the district attorney, resulting from such class representation. All proceeds retained by a district attorney pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the appropriate account as provided by law.

(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any district attorney to exercise the powers conferred upon the Attorney General by an act of Congress of September 30, 1976, (P.L. 94-905; 90 Stat. 1983) also known as the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, except at the direction of the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 865, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

16750.1.

Any civil action to enforce any cause of action for a violation of this chapter shall be commenced within four years after the cause of action accrued. No cause of action barred under existing law on the effective date of the amendment of this section at the 1977–78 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be revived by such amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 541.)
-------------------------------------------

16750.2.

Any person, other than the Attorney General or a district attorney, who commences, by writ or appeal, any proceeding in the Supreme Court of California or a state court of appeal in which a violation of this chapter is alleged or any application of this chapter is in issue shall serve notice thereof upon the Attorney General within three days after the commencement of the proceeding, provided that such time may be extended by the Chief Justice or presiding justice for good cause shown. No relief, temporary or permanent, shall be granted until proof of service of this notice is filed with the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 765, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16751.

Whenever it appears to the court before which any proceedings under this chapter are pending that the ends of justice require that other parties shall be brought before the court, the court may cause them to be made parties defendant and summoned, whether or not they reside in the county where such action is pending.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

16752.

Upon a violation of this chapter by any corporation or association the Attorney General or the district attorney of the proper county may institute proper proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction for the forfeiture of charter rights, franchises or privileges and powers exercised by such corporation or association, and for the dissolution of the corporation or association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2079.)
-------------------------------------------

16753.

Every foreign corporation or association, exercising any of the powers, franchises or functions of a corporation in this state, which violates this chapter, is subject to revocation of those powers, franchises or functions and upon such revocation is prohibited from doing any business in this state. The Attorney General, or a district attorney of a county where the offense or any part thereof is committed, may enforce this provision by bringing proper proceedings by injunction or otherwise. Upon receipt of a certified copy of the judgment and decree of any court of competent jurisdiction finding any foreign corporation or association guilty of violating this chapter and ordering a revocation of its powers, franchises or functions of a corporation in this state, the Secretary of State shall revoke the license of any such corporation or association heretofore authorized to do business in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

16754.

The Attorney General, or the district attorney of any county, subject to the notice requirements of subdivision (g) of Section 16750, shall initiate civil actions or criminal proceedings for violation of this chapter. Civil actions and criminal proceedings for violation of this chapter initiated by the Attorney General or district attorney may be brought in the superior court in and for any county where the offense or any part thereof is committed or where any of the offenders reside or where any corporate defendant does business. In any civil action or criminal proceeding brought by a district attorney pursuant to this section, the Attorney General shall have all of the powers set forth in Section 12550 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

16754.5.

In any civil action brought by the Attorney General or a district attorney under this chapter, the court may, in addition to granting such prohibitory injunctions and other restraints as it may deem expedient to deter the defendant from, and insure against, his committing a future violation of this chapter, grant such mandatory injunctions as may be reasonably necessary to restore and preserve fair competition in the trade or commerce affected by the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

16755.

(a) Any violation of this chapter is a conspiracy against trade, and any person who engages in any such conspiracy or takes part therein, or aids or advises in its commission, or who as principal, manager, director, agent, servant or employee, or in any other capacity, knowingly carries out any of the stipulations, purposes, prices, rates, or furnishes any information to assist in carrying out those purposes, or orders thereunder or in pursuance thereof, is punishable, as follows:

(1) If the violator is a corporation, by a fine of not more than
 six million dollars ($6,000,000) or the applicable amount under paragraph (3), whichever is greater.

(2) If the violator is an individual, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for one, two, or three years, by imprisonment for not more than one year in a county jail, by a fine of not more than the greater of one million dollars ($1,000,000) and a fine of the applicable amount under paragraph (3), or by both a fine and imprisonment.

(3) If any
 person derives pecuniary gain from a violation of this chapter, or the violation results in pecuniary loss to a person other than the violator, the violator may be fined not more than an amount equal to the amount of the gross gain multiplied by two or an amount equal to the amount of the gross loss multiplied by two, whichever is applicable.

(b) Any action pursuant to this section may be commenced at any time within four years after the commission of the last act comprising a part of any violation. No cause of action barred under existing law on the effective date of the amendment of this section at the 1977–78 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be revived by that amendment.

(c) All moneys received by any court in payment of any fine or civil penalty imposed
 pursuant to this section shall, as soon as practicable after receipt thereof, be deposited with the county treasurer of the county in which the court is situated. Amounts so deposited shall be paid as soon as practicable as follows: 100 percent to the Treasurer by warrant of the county auditor drawn upon the requisition of the clerk or judge of said court to be deposited in the Attorney General antitrust account within the General Fund of the State
 Treasury, as established under Section 12526 of the Government Code, on order of the Controller if the moneys received resulted from an action initiated and prosecuted by the Attorney General. If the action was initiated and prosecuted by a district attorney, then 100 percent shall be paid as soon as practicable to the treasurer of the county in which the prosecution is conducted. If the action was initiated and prosecuted jointly by the Attorney General and a district attorney or jointly by more than one district attorney, those amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer and to the treasurer or treasurers of the county or counties participating in the prosecution in a proportion agreed upon by the agencies jointly prosecuting the case and as approved by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (SB 763)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16755.1.

(a) A civil penalty of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be assessed and recovered in any civil action brought by the Attorney General or district attorney against any person, corporation, or business entity for each violation of this chapter.

(b) In assessing the amount of a civil penalty pursuant to this section, a court or jury shall consider any relevant circumstances presented by any of the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The nature and seriousness of the misconduct.

(2) The number of violations committed by the defendant.

(3) The persistence of the defendant’s misconduct.

(4) The length of time over which the defendant’s misconduct occurred.

(5) The willfulness of the defendant’s misconduct.

(6) The defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(7) The extent to which the defendant cooperated in the Attorney General’s or district attorney’s investigation and litigation.

(c) The penalty described in this
 section shall be recovered only in a civil action brought by the Attorney General or a district attorney, or by any of that person’s attorneys designated by it for that purpose, against any party that violates this chapter.

(d) A penalty collected pursuant to this section shall accrue only to the State of California or the county treasurer of the county in which the court is situated, and all proceeds retained pursuant to this section shall be deposited pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16755.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 426, Sec. 2.   (SB 763)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16756.

In any indictment, information or complaint for any offense named in this chapter, it is sufficient to state the purpose or effects of the trust or combination, and that the accused is a member of, acted with, or in pursuance of it, or aided or assisted in carrying out its purposes, without giving its name or description, or how, when and where it was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

16756.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, in a complaint for any violation of this chapter, it is sufficient to contain factual allegations demonstrating that the existence of a contract, combination in the form of a trust, or conspiracy to restrain trade or commerce is plausible, and the complaint shall not be required to allege facts tending to exclude the possibility of independent action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 338, Sec. 2.   (AB 325)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16757.

(a) In prosecutions under this chapter, it is sufficient to prove that a trust or combination exists, and that the defendant belonged to it, or acted for or in connection with it, without proving all the members belonging to it, or proving or producing any article of agreement, or any written instrument on which it may have been based, or that it was evidenced by any written instrument at all.

(b) The character of the trust or combination alleged may be established by proof of its general reputation as such.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

16758.

In any action or proceeding brought by the Attorney General or any district attorney for the violation of this chapter no person shall be excused from attending, testifying or producing books, papers, or documents in obedience to subpena or under order of court on the ground that the testimony or evidence required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to any penalty.

No individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty for or on account of any transaction, matter or thing concerning which he may so testify or produce evidence in any action or proceeding brought by the Attorney General or a district attorney under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

16759.

(a) All those powers granted to the Attorney General as a head of a department under Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall be granted to the district attorney of any county when that district attorney reasonably believes that there may have been a violation of Article 2 (commencing with Section 16720) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 16750) of this chapter, or a violation of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of this part, or a violation of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of this part, and shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 7460) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government
 Code.

(b) All those powers granted to the Attorney General as head of a department under Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall be granted to the city attorney of any city having a population in excess of 750,000, to the county counsel of any county within which a city has a population in excess of 750,000, or to a city attorney of a city and county, when the city attorney or county counsel reasonably believes that there may have been a violation of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of this part and shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 7460) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(c) Any investigation pursuant to these powers shall be conducted
 in accordance with the procedures set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, including all applicable principles relating to immunity from self-incrimination. However, Section 16758 shall not be construed as providing automatic immunity with respect to the subject of a subpoena issued in connection with that investigation. Court orders sought pursuant to this section shall be sought in the superior court of the county in which the district attorney, authorized pursuant to subdivision (a), or the city attorney or county counsel, authorized pursuant to subdivision (b), seeking the order holds office.

(d) Should the recipient of such subpoena issued pursuant to the powers granted in subdivision (b)
 object to the request in whole or in part, the recipient must serve objections and meet and confer with the issuer of the subpoena in an attempt to address those objections. If after meeting and conferring, the issuer and recipient cannot reach agreement, the recipient may petition the superior court for an order quashing or modifying the subpoena in whole or in part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 698, Sec. 1.   (AB 2766)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16760.

(a) (1) The Attorney General may bring a civil action in the name of the people of the State of California, as parens patriae on behalf of natural persons residing in the state, in the superior court of any county which has jurisdiction of a defendant, to secure monetary relief as provided in this section for injury sustained by those natural persons to their property by reason of any violation of this chapter. The court shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief awarded in the action any amount of monetary relief (A) which duplicates amounts which have been awarded for the same injury, or (B) which is properly allocable to (i) natural persons who have excluded their claims pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and (ii) any business entity.

(2) The court shall award the state as monetary relief three times the total damage sustained as described in paragraph (1), the interest on the total damages pursuant to Section 16761, and the costs of suit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee.

(3) The court may, in its discretion, award a reasonable attorney’s fee to a prevailing defendant upon a finding that the Attorney General or district attorney has acted in bad faith, vexatiously, wantonly, or for oppressive reasons.

(b) (1) In any action brought under this section, the Attorney General shall, at any time, in any manner, and with any content as the court may direct, cause notice thereof to be given by publication. If the court finds that notice given solely by publication would deny due process of law to any person or persons, the court may direct further notice to the person or persons according to the circumstances of the case.

(2) Any person on whose behalf an action is brought under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may elect to exclude from adjudication the portion of the claim for monetary relief attributable to him or her by filing notice of that election with the court within the time as specified in the notice given pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The final judgment in an action under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be res judicata as to any claim under this section by any person on behalf of whom the action was brought and who fails to give notice within the period specified in the notice given pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) An action under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not be dismissed or compromised without the approval of the court, and notice of any proposed dismissal or compromise shall be given in any manner as the court directs.

(d) In any action under this chapter, where there has been a determination that a defendant agreed to fix prices, damages may be proved and assessed in the aggregate by statistical or sampling methods, by the pro rata allocation of illegal overcharges or of excess profits, or by any other reasonable system of estimating aggregate damages as the court in its discretion may permit without the necessity of separately proving the individual claim of, or amount of damage to, persons on whose behalf the suit was brought.

(e) Monetary relief recovered by the Attorney General under this section shall be distributed as follows:

(1) In any manner as the superior court having jurisdiction over the action in its discretion may authorize to insure, to the extent possible, that each person be afforded a reasonable opportunity to secure his or her appropriate portion of the monetary relief. In exercising its discretion, the court may employ cy pres or fluid recovery mechanisms as a way of providing value to persons injured as a result of a violation of this chapter.

(2) The Attorney General shall retain that portion of the monetary relief awarded by the court as costs of suit and attorney’s fee for deposit in the Attorney General Antitrust Account within the General Fund.

(3) To the extent that the monetary relief awarded by the court is not exhausted by distribution under paragraphs (1) and (2), the remaining funds shall be treated under the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1530) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 1540) of Chapter 7 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure as if it were unclaimed property, as defined in Section 1300 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) The powers granted in this section are in addition to and not in derogation of the powers granted to the Attorney General by common law in respect to bringing actions parens patriae.

(g) The district attorney of any county may prosecute any action on behalf of the natural persons residing in the county which the Attorney General is authorized to bring pursuant to subdivision (a), whenever it appears that the activities giving rise to the prosecution or the effects of the activities occur primarily within that county. Prior to bringing the action, a district attorney shall comply with the notice requirements provided in subdivision (g) of Section 16750. In any action brought pursuant to this subdivision, the provisions of subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, shall be applicable, except that the portion of monetary relief awarded by the court as attorney’s fee and costs shall be retained by the district attorney for deposit in the appropriate account as provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 74, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16761.

The court may award, pursuant to a motion by a person who has recovered damages pursuant to Section 16750, or by the Attorney General who has secured monetary relief pursuant to Section 16760, interest on actual damages at the rate of 10 percent per annum for the period beginning on the date of service of such person’s or the Attorney General’s complaint setting forth a claim for violation of this chapter and ending on the date of judgment, or for any shorter period therein, if the court finds that the award of interest for such period is just in the circumstances. In determining whether an award of interest under this section for any period is just in the circumstances, the court shall consider only the following:

(a) Whether the person, the Attorney General, or the opposing party, or the representative of any of those parties, made motions or asserted claims or defenses so lacking in merit as to show that the party or representative acted intentionally for delay, or otherwise acted in bad faith.

(b) Whether, in the course of the action involved, the person, the Attorney General, or the opposing party, or the representative of any of those parties, violated any applicable rule, statute, or court order providing for sanctions for dilatory behavior or otherwise providing for expeditious proceedings.

(c) Whether the person, the Attorney General, or the opposing party, or the representative of any of those parties, engaged in conduct primarily for the purpose of delaying the litigation or increasing the cost thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1069, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

16762.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies or penalties provided by this chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under other state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 426, Sec. 3.   (SB 763)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Health Care Services [16770. - 16770.]

16770.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that the citizens of this state receive high-quality health care coverage in the most efficient and cost-effective manner possible.

(b) In furtherance of this intent, the Legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest to enhance the ability of California purchasers, providers, and payers to form efficient-sized bargaining units for the purpose of contracting for the delivery of health care services.

(c) This Legislature has previously demonstrated its intent in this area by the recent enactment of Chapters 328, 329, and 1594 of the Statutes of 1982 authorizing various types of contracts to be entered into between public or private purchasers or payers of health care coverage, and institutional or professional providers of health care services.

(d) The Legislature further finds and declares that individual providers or purchasers, whether institutional, professional, or otherwise, have not proven to be efficient-sized bargaining units for these contracts, and that the formation of groups and combinations of institutional and professional providers and purchasing groups for the purpose of creating efficient-sized contracting units represents a meaningful addition to the health care marketplace.

(e) The Legislature, however, recognizes that the 1982 decision of the United States Supreme Court in Arizona v. Maricopa Medical Society serves as a disincentive to the development of contracting for health care services because purchasers, providers, and payers who enter into contracts bear the risk of being found guilty of committing per se antitrust violations.

(f) The Legislature further finds and declares that the public interest in ensuring that citizens of this state receive high-quality health care coverage in the most efficient and cost-effective manner possible is furthered by permitting negotiations for alternative rate contracts between purchasers or payers of health care services, and institutional and professional providers, or through a person or entity acting for, or on behalf of, a purchaser, payer, or provider. 

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature, therefore, that the formation of groups and combinations of providers and purchasing groups for the purpose of creating efficient-sized contracting units be recognized as the creation of a new product within the health care marketplace, and be subject, therefore, only to those antitrust prohibitions applicable to the conduct of other presumptively legitimate enterprises.

These provisions are in addition to those provided for under Section 1342.6 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10133.6 of the Insurance Code.

(h) This section does not change existing antitrust law as it relates to any agreement or arrangement to exclude from any of the above-described groups or combinations, any person who is lawfully qualified to perform the services to be performed by the members of the group or combination, where the ground for the exclusion is failure to possess the same license or certification as is possessed by the members of the group or combination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Combinations to Obstruct Sales of Livestock [16800. - 16804.]

16800.

It is unlawful for any two or more persons, or corporations, to combine or agree together to do any act which will, in any respect, prevent any person from buying livestock at any place in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 67.)
-------------------------------------------

16801.

It is unlawful for any corporation organized under the laws of this State, or the board of directors, trustees, stockholders, agents, or officers of any corporation, to pass or enforce any rule, by-law, or regulation whereby any officer, stockholder, member, shareholder, agent, servant thereof, or any other person in any way interested in or connected with such corporation shall in any respect be prohibited, prevented, or enjoined from buying livestock in any market in this State where livestock is brought to be sold.

Every such rule, regulation, or by-law is declared to be contrary to the public policy of this State, and is unlawful and void. Any person who attempts, directly or indirectly, to enforce any such rule, regulation, or by-law, is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to the penalties prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 67.)
-------------------------------------------

16802.

No trust, combination, or conspiracy shall be organized or exist in this State to prevent any person or corporation from selling livestock on commission at such rate as the person or corporation may see fit to charge. Any rule, regulation, by-law, or agreement of any corporation, association, society, or combination of persons, whereby any such parties are required to charge not less than a given sum for commissions, or whereby any person or commission merchant is, in any respect, restrained from charging less than a certain fixed sum for his services as such commission merchant in the sale of livestock, is declared to be contrary to the public policy of this State, and is unlawful.

Any person who enters into any such trust, combination, or conspiracy, or who enforces or aids, abets, assists, or encourages the enforcement of any such rule, regulation, by-law, or agreement, is liable to the penalties prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 67.)
-------------------------------------------

16803.

Any person who, directly or indirectly, is a party to any combination, conspiracy, or association, which attempts, directly or indirectly, to prevent any other person from freely selling livestock at any market in this State for such persons as see fit to engage his services, or who endeavors to compel, directly or indirectly, any person to charge not less than a fixed minimum sum for services in the sale of livestock, or who, in any way, hinders or prevents any person from lawfully selling livestock for another for such rate of commission as may be agreed upon is guilty of a misdemeanor, and subject to the penalties prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 67.)
-------------------------------------------

16804.

A violation of any provision of this chapter is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or both. A person violating any provision of this chapter shall be liable, in civil action, to any person aggrieved thereby, for the full amount of damages sustained by reason of the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 67.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Unfair Trade Practices [17000. - 17101.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [17000. - 17002.]

17000.

This chapter may be cited as the Unfair Practices Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.

The Legislature declares that the purpose of this chapter is to safeguard the public against the creation or perpetuation of monopolies and to foster and encourage competition, by prohibiting unfair, dishonest, deceptive, destructive, fraudulent and discriminatory practices by which fair and honest competition is destroyed or prevented.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17002.

This chapter shall be liberally construed that its beneficial purposes may be subserved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [17020. - 17031.]

17020.

The definitions in this article shall be used in construing this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17021.

“Person” includes any person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, company, corporation or municipal or other public corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17022.

“Sell” includes selling, offering for sale or advertising for sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17023.

“Give” includes giving, offering to give or advertising the intent to give.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17024.

“Article or product” includes any article, product, commodity, thing of value, service or output of a service trade.

Motion picture films when licensed for exhibition to motion picture houses are not articles or products under this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter applies:

(1) To any service, article or product for which rates are established under the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission of this State and sold or furnished by any public utility corporation, or installation and repair services rendered in connection
 with any services, articles or products.

(2) To any service, article or product sold or furnished by a publicly owned public utility and upon which the rates would have been established under the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission of this State if such service, article or product had been sold or furnished by a public utility corporation, or installation and repair services rendered in connection with any services, articles or products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1638.)
-------------------------------------------

17025.

“Vendor” includes any person who performs work upon, renovates, alters or improves any personal property belonging to another person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

17026.

“Cost” as applied to production includes the cost of raw materials, labor and all overhead expenses of the producer.

“Cost” as applied to distribution means the invoice or replacement cost, whichever is lower, of the article or product to the distributor and vendor, plus the cost of doing business by the distributor and vendor and in the absence of proof of cost of doing business a markup of 6 percent on such invoice or replacement cost shall be prima facie proof of such cost of doing business.

“Cost” as applied to warranty service agreements includes the cost of parts, transporting the
 parts, labor, and all overhead expenses of the service agency. 

Discounts granted for cash payments shall not be used to reduce costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

17026.1.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 17026, commissions or rebates regularly earned by the retailers of cellular telephones may be used to reduce cost, provided, that in no event shall the reduction exceed the greater of the following:

(A) Ten percent of cost, as defined in Section 17026.

(B) Twenty dollars ($20).

(2) Consistent with the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 17050, providers of cellular services shall be permitted to sell cellular telephones below cost, provided that sales below cost are a good faith endeavor to meet the legal market prices of competitors in the same locality or trade area.

(b) In each retail location, all retailers of cellular telephones shall post a large conspicuous sign, in lettering no smaller than 36-point type, that states the following: “Activation of any cellular telephone is not required and the advertised price of any cellular telephone is not contingent upon activation, acceptance, or denial of cellular service by any cellular provider.”

The sign shall be prominently displayed and visible to consumers and located in that area in each retail location where cellular telephones are displayed and purchased.

(c) No retailer of cellular telephones shall refuse to sell a cellular telephone to any customer solely on the basis of the customer’s refusal to activate the telephone with the provider of cellular service for whom the retailer is an agent. Nothing herein shall preclude a retailer from limiting the number of cellular telephones that he or she is otherwise required under this subdivision to sell to any single customer.

The intent of this subdivision is to reaffirm the Legislature’s support for the Public Utilities Commission’s policy that makes illegal the act, or practice, of “bundling,” as defined and described in relevant decisions and orders of the commission.

(d) The Public Utilities Commission may adopt rules and regulations to fully implement and enforce the provisions of this section.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to reduce, alter, or otherwise modify the authority of the California Public Utilities Commission to regulate, in any manner, or prohibit, the payment of commissions or rebates to distributors or vendors of cellular telephones. The provisions of this section shall be effective only to the extent that they do not conflict with any applicable regulations, rules, or orders promulgated or issued by the Public Utilities Commission.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative January 1, 1994, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17026.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 17026, regular term discounts granted to distributors by manufacturers of cigarettes for cash payment customarily offered to distributors without discrimination may be used to reduce cost.

This section shall not apply to any anticipatory or special discount for cash that may be offered by the manufacturers of cigarettes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 9, Sec. 1.   Effective March 4, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17027.

In establishing the cost of a given article or product to the distributor and vendor, the invoice cost of the article or product purchased at a forced, bankruptcy, closeout sale, or other sale outside of the ordinary channels of trade may not be used as a basis for justifying a price lower than one based upon the replacement cost as of the date of the sale of the article or product replaced through the ordinary channels of trade,
 unless the article or product is kept separate from goods purchased in the ordinary channels of trade and unless the article or product is advertised and sold as merchandise purchased at a forced, bankruptcy, closeout sale, or by means other than through the ordinary channels of trade.

Such advertising shall state the conditions under which the goods were purchased, and the quantity of the merchandise to be sold or offered for sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 2.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17028.

“Ordinary channels of trade” means those ordinary, regular and daily transactions in the mercantile trade whereby title to an article or product, in no way damaged or deteriorated, is transferred from one person to another.

“Ordinary channels of trade” does not include bankruptcy sales of stocks, closeout goods, dents, sales of goods bought from a business or merchant retiring from
 business, fire sales and sales of damaged or deteriorated goods, which damage or deterioration results from any cause whatsoever. This listing is not all inclusive but as example only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 3.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17029.

“Cost of doing business” or “overhead expense” means all costs of doing business incurred in the conduct of the business and shall include without limitation the following items of expense: labor (including salaries of executives and officers), rent, interest on borrowed capital, depreciation, selling cost, maintenance of equipment, delivery costs, credit losses, all types of licenses, taxes, insurance and advertising.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)